extensions/2827229_corecteur-ortografe-simplifiee/corecteur_ortografe_simplifiee-2.1/dictionaries/fr-erofa.dic
acquérir/iK() po:v3__t_q__a
conquérir/iK() po:v3_it_q__a
endormir/iJ() po:v3_it_q__a
enquérir/iM() po:v3____p_e_
réacquérir/iK() po:v3__t____a
reconquérir/iK() po:v3_it_q__a
rendormir/iJ() po:v3__t_q__a
requérir/iK() po:v3__t____a
